Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.2, as
last amended by Section 121, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1000.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.2. A. The Construction Industries Board is hereby
re-created to continue until July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031, in
accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The
Board shall regulate the plumbing, electrical, and mechanical
trades, the building and construction inspectors, the home
inspectors, and the roofing contractors through the powers and
duties set forth in the Construction Industries Board Act and in the
respective licensing or registration acts for such trades, or as
otherwise provided by law.

B. 1. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Board shall be composed of
seven (7) members appointed by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Oklahoma State Senate, as follows:
a. two members shall have at least ten (10) years’
experience in the plumbing trade, of which one shall
be a plumbing contractor and one shall be a journeyman
plumber,
b. two members shall have at least ten (10) years’
experience in the electrical trade, of which one shall
be an electrical contractor and one shall be a
journeyman electrician,
c. two members shall have at least ten (10) years’
experience in the mechanical trade, of which one shall
be a mechanical contractor and one shall be a
mechanical journeyman, and
d. one member shall have at least ten (10) years’
experience as a building and construction inspector.
2. Members shall be appointed for staggered terms of four (4)
years, as designated by the Governor. Members shall continue in
office until a successor is appointed by the Governor. The Governor
shall fill all vacancies and unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointment of the member whose position is to be
filled. A member may be removed by the Governor at any time.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1457 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 3rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1457 Page 3